Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-6-501.7 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. To protect the health and safety of the people of this
state, land application of sludge and biosolid material containing
human fecal matter is hereby prohibited on and after July 1, 2028.
On and after the effective date of this act, the Department of
Environmental Quality shall not issue any new permit for the land
Req. No. 15970 Page 1

appl ication of sludge or biosolid material containing human fecal
matter. Renewal of permits for land application shall be left to
the discretion of the Department of Environmental Quality.
B. 1. Not later than September 1, 2026, all persons or
entities permitted to land apply sludge or biosolid material
containing human fecal matter shall reduce the amount of such
material land applied by at least twenty-five percent (25%).
2. Not later than September 1, 2027, all persons or entities
permitted to land apply sludge or biosolid material containing human
fecal matter shall reduce the amount of such material land applied
by at least fifty percent (50%).
C. Not later than September 1, 2026, any person or entity
permitted to land apply sludge or biosolid material containing human
fecal matter shall submit a plan for full cessation of such actions
to the Department of Environmental Quality. The plan shall be
compiled and submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the
Department. The Department shall promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section.
D. For the purposes of this section:
1. "Biosolid material" means sewage sludge containing any
perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substance; and
2. "Sludge" shall mean sludge as defined pursuant to Section 2-
10-401 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes.

Req. No. 15970 Page 2

SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15970 JL 01/27/26


















Req. No. 15970 Page 3